ko: 스트랩 연결 하드웨어: 카라비너 스타일 클립; 폐쇄형 루프; 고정형 후크; 가죽 타이; 개방형 후크; 퀵 릴리스 클립; 스냅 후크; 스프링 클립; 스위블 후크; 기타
de: Befestigungsmechanismus des Gurts: Karabiner-Clip; Geschlossene Schlaufe; Fester Haken; Lederband; Offener Haken; Schnellverschluss-Clip; Karabinerhaken; Federclip; Schwenkhaken; Andere
th: อุปกรณ์ยึดสายสะพาย: คลิปสไตล์คาราบิเนอร์; ห่วงปิด; ตะขอแบบตายตัว; เชือกผูกหนัง; ตะขอแบบเปิด; คลิปปลดเร็ว; ตะขอสแน็ป; คลิปสปริง; ตะขอหมุนได้; อื่นๆ
es: Accesorio de sujeción de la correa: Clip tipo mosquetón; Bucle cerrado; Gancho fijo; Cordón de cuero; Gancho abierto; Clip de liberación rápida; Gancho de seguridad; Clip de resorte; Gancho giratorio; Otro
sv: Utformning av sträng : Karbinhake; Sluten ögla; Fast krok; Läderband; Öppen krok; Snabbspänne; Snäpphake; Fjäderklämma; Lekande hake; Övrigt
tr: Kayış bağlantı donanımı: Karabina stili klips; Kapalı halka; Sabit kanca; Deri bağcık; Açık kanca; Hızlı çıkarılabilen klips; Yaylı kanca; Yaylı klips; Döner kanca; Diğer
ro-RO: Componente de prindere a curelei: Clemă tip carabinieră; Buclă închisă; Cârlig fix; Legătură de piele; Cârlig deschis; Clemă cu eliberare rapidă; Carabină; Clemă cu arc; Cârlig pivotant; Altele
zh-TW: 束帶固定五金: 登山扣式夾; 閉環; 固定鉤; 皮質綁帶; 開口鉤; 快拆夾; 彈簧鉤; 彈簧夾; 旋轉鉤; 其他
pt-PT: Acessórios para fixação da correia: Mosquetão; Laço fechado; Gancho fixo; Atilho em couro; Gancho aberto; Clipe de desengate rápido; Mosquetão com mola; Clipe de mola; Gancho giratório; Outro
hr-HR: Okovi za pričvršćivanje remena: Kopča u stilu karabinera; Zatvorena petlja; Fiksna kuka; Kožna vezica; Otvorena kuka; Kopča za brzo otpuštanje; Karabiner kopča; Opružna kopča; Okretna kuka; Ostalo
nl: Bevestigingshardware band: Karabijnhaak-clip; Gesloten lus; Vaste haak; Leren veter; Open haak; Quick-release-clip; Musketonhaak; Veerklem; Draaibare haak; Overig
sk-SK: Upevňovacie prvky popruhu: Karabínová spona; Uzavretá slučka; Pevný háčik; Kožená šnúrka; Otvorený háčik; Rýchloupínacia spona; Karabínka; Pružinová spona; Otočný háčik; Iné
vi: Trang thiết bị gắn dây đeo: Kẹp kiểu carabiner; Vòng kín; Móc cố định; Dây buộc da; Móc hở; Kẹp tháo nhanh; Móc bấm; Kẹp lò xo; Móc xoay; Khác
fi: Hihnan kiinnityslaitteisto: Karbiinihakatyylinen kiinnike; Suljettu lenkki; Kiinteä koukku; Nahkanauha; Avoin koukku; Pikalukko; Jousihaka; Jousiklipis; Leikarihaka; Muu
sl-SI: Okovje za pritrditev pasu: Sponka v stilu vponke; Zaprta zanka; Fiksni kavelj; Usnjena vrvica; Odprt kavelj; Sponka za hitro sprostitev; Zaskočni kavelj; Vzmetna sponka; Vrtljivi kavelj; Drugo
ja: ストラップアタッチメントハードウェア: カラビナスタイルクリップ; クローズドループ; 固定フック; レザータイ; オープンフック; クイックリリースクリップ; スナップフック; スプリングクリップ; スイベルフック; その他
el: Υλικό στερέωσης ιμάντα: Κλιπ τύπου καραμπίνερ; Κλειστός βρόχος; Σταθερός γάντζος; Δερμάτινο κορδόνι; Ανοιχτός γάντζος; Κλιπ ταχείας απασφάλισης; Γάντζος ασφαλείας; Κλιπ με ελατήριο; Περιστρεφόμενος γάντζος; Άλλο
pl: Osprzęt mocowania paska: Karabińczyk; Zamknięta pętla; Hak stały; Skórzane wiązanie; Hak otwarty; Szybkozłączka; Zatrzaśnik; Klamra ze sprężyną; Hak z krętlikiem; Inne
it: Hardware di fissaggio del cinturino: Clip a moschettone; Ad anello chiuso; A gancio fisso; Laccio in pelle; A gancio aperto; Clip a sgancio rapido; A moschettone; Clip a molla; Gancio girevole; Altro
pt-BR: Equipamentos de fixação das correias: Clipe tipo mosquetão; Laço fechado; Gancho fixo; Tira de couro (amarração); Gancho aberto; Clipe de liberação rápida; Mosquetão; Clipe com mola; Gancho giratório; Outro
cs: Kování pro uchycení popruhu: Karabina; Uzavřená smyčka; Pevný háček; Kožená šňůrka; Otevřený háček; Rychloupínací spona; Karabinka; Pružinová spona; Otočná karabina; Jiné
bg-BG: Метални елементи за закрепване на ремъка: Клипс тип карабинер; Затворена примка; Фиксирана кука; Кожена връзка; Отворена кука; Клипс за бързо освобождаване; Карабинка; Пружинен клипс; Въртяща се кука; Друго
zh-CN: 背带连接五金件: 登山扣式夹子; 闭环; 固定钩; 皮系带; 开钩; 快拆夹子; 弹簧钩; 弹簧夹; 旋转钩; 其他
fr: Accessoires de fixation pour sangles: Mousqueton; Boucle fermée; Crochet fixe; Lien en cuir; Crochet ouvert; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Mousqueton à pompe; Pince à ressort; Mousqueton tournant; Autre
en: Strap attachment hardware: Carabiner-style clip; Closed loop; Fixed hook; Leather tie; Open hook; Quick-release clip; Snap hook; Spring clip; Swivel hook; Other
ru: Фурнитура крепления ремня: Зажим-карабин; Закрытая петля; Фиксированный крючок; Кожаная завязка; Открытый крючок; Быстросъемный зажим; Карабин; Пружинный зажим; Вертлюжный карабин; Другое
da: Fastgørelsesbeslag til rem: Karabinhageklips; Lukket løkke; Fast krog; Læderbånd; Åben krog; Quick-release-klips; Karabinhage; Fjederklips; Drejekrog; Andet
nb: Maskinvare for festing av stropp: Karabinkrok; Lukket løkke; Fast krok; Skinnknyting; Åpen krok; Hurtigutløserklemme; Sikringskrok; Fjærklemme; Svivelkrok; Annet
lt-LT: Dirželio tvirtinimo detalės: Karabino tipo segtukas; Uždara kilpa; Fiksuotas kabliukas; Odiniai raiščiai; Atviras kabliukas; Greitojo atsegimo segtukas; Spyruoklinis kabliukas; Spyruoklinis segtukas; Besisukantis kabliukas; Kita
hu: Pánt rögzítő vasalat: Karabiner stílusú csipesz; Zárt hurok; Fix kampó; Bőrkötő; Nyitott kampó; Gyorskioldó csat; Karabineres kampó; Rugós csipesz; Forgó kampó; Egyéb